District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5004

Issue of receipt that does not state warehouseman’s ownership of goods

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(aaa)-(fff), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3701 to 22-3706.